Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Sexual Assault

Sexual assault offenses require general criminal intent

or a mens rea. Chavez v. State, 601 P.2d 166,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 470

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Entrapment defense in sex offense prosecutions, 12 ALR4th 413.

Criminal responsibility of husband for rape, or assault to commit rape, on wife, 24 ALR4th 105.

Admissibility, at criminal prosecution, of expert testimony on rape trauma syndrome, 42 ALR4th 879.

Admissibility of expert testimony as to criminal defendant's propensity toward sexual deviation, 42 ALR4th 937.

Sexual child abuser's civil liability to child's parent, 54 ALR4th 93.

Imputation of criminal, abnormal, or otherwise offensive sexual attitude or behavior as defamation — post-New York Times cases, 57 ALR4th 404.

Prosecution of female as principal for rape, 67 ALR4th 1127.

Admissibility, in prosecution for sex-related offense, of results of tests on semen or seminal fluids, 75 ALR4th 897.

Fact that murder-rape victim was dead at time of penetration as affecting conviction for rape, 76 ALR4th 1147.

Admissibility in prosecution for sex offense of evidence of victim's sexual activity after the offense, 81 ALR4th 1076.

Liability of church or religious society for sexual misconduct of clergy, 5 ALR5th 530.

Failure of state or local government entity to protect child abuse victim as violation of federal constitutional right, 79 ALR Fed 514.

§ 6-2-301.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Actor” means the person accused of criminal assault;

“Intimate parts” means the external genitalia, perineum, anus or pubes of any person or the breast of a female person;

“Physically helpless” means unconscious, asleep or otherwise physically unable to communicate unwillingness to act;

“Position of authority” means that position occupied by a parent, guardian, relative, household member, teacher, employer, custodian, health care provider or any other person who, by reason of his position, is able to exercise significant influence over a person;

“Sexual assault” means any act made criminal pursuant to W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-319

;

“Sexual contact” means touching, with the intention of sexual arousal, gratification or abuse, of the victim’s intimate parts by the actor, or of the actor’s intimate parts by the victim, or of the clothing covering the immediate area of the victim’s or actor’s intimate parts;

“Sexual intrusion” means:

Any intrusion, however slight, by any object or any part of a person’s body, except the mouth, tongue or penis, into the genital or anal opening of another person’s body if that sexual intrusion can reasonably be construed as being for the purposes of sexual arousal, gratification or abuse; or

Sexual intercourse, cunnilingus, fellatio, analingus or anal intercourse with or without emission.

“Victim” means the person alleged to have been subjected to sexual assault;

“Health care provider” means an individual who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or permitted by the laws of this state to provide care, treatment, services or procedures to maintain, diagnose or otherwise treat a patient’s physical or mental condition;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75,§ 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1997, ch. 135, § 1; 2001, ch. 41, § 2; 2007, ch. 159, § 2; 2010, ch. 82, § 1; ch. 87, § 2; 2018 ch. 80, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “6-2-319” for “6-2-313” in (a)(ix).

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by ch. 82, § 1, in (a)(v), substituted “6-2-319” for “6-2-304.”

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The second 2010 amendment, by ch. 87, § 2, effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(ix), substituted “6-2-320” for “6-2-319.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(iv), inserted “health care provider”; added (a)(ix); and redesignated former (a)(ix) as (a)(x).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Sexual intrusion.—

Evidence was sufficient to prove sexual intrusion on the alleged seven-year-old victim by sexual intercourse because (1) the victim testified that defendant put defendant’s privates to the victim’s private parts; (2) the SANE nurse testified that the victim told the nurse that defendant laid the victim down, spread the victim’s legs apart, and that defendant’s private parts touched the victim’s private parts in and out; and (3) the victim’s parent testified that defendant was then 29 years old. Jackson v. State, 2019 WY 81, 445 P.3d 983,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2019).

Jury instructions. —

Although the district court erred by failing to define substantial step for the jury and by including the concept of attempt in the elements of second-degree sexual abuse of a minor when instructing the jury, counsel was not ineffective in failing to object to the instructions as defendant was not prejudiced by the failure to object because the evidence against him was overwhelming as defendant’s statements over several weeks confirmed he had the specific intent to inflict sexual intrusion upon the victim and his actions were strongly corroborative of the firmness of his intention to complete the crime of second-degree sexual abuse of a minor. Weston v. State, 2019 WY 113, 451 P.3d 758,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2019).

Sexual arousal, gratification element of charged crime.—

District court did not err by denying defendant’s motion to judgment of acquittal because the victim’s testimony alone was sufficient to support the jury’s finding that defendant sexually assaulted the victim as the victim described, and rational jurors could reasonably conclude that defendant touched the victim for sexual arousal or gratification, given that the victim testified that when the two were alone in the bathroom and the victim was only partially clothed, defendant rubbed the victim’s right breast/chest area with her hand and then placed defendant’s penis in the victim’s genitalia repeatedly, and thereafter, defendant told the victim to keep it a secret. Martinez v. State, 2018 WY 147, 432 P.3d 493,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 2018).

There was sufficient evidence to support defendant’s convictions for second-degree sexual abuse of a minor because his effort to mask his actions by placing a blanket over himself and the girls, his repeated touchings of the girls in virtually identical ways, and his instructions to keep the touchings secret supported a finding of intent of sexual gratification.
Jones v. State, 2019 WY 45, 439 P.3d 753,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 4

5

(Wyo. 2019);
Pier v. State, 2019 WY 3, 432 P.3d 890,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2019).

Sexual contact.—

There was sufficient evidence to support defendant’s convictions for second-degree sexual abuse of a minor because the victim’s testimony that defendant touched her “a little over her privates” provided sufficient evidence to permit a rational trier of fact to find that he had engaged in sexual contact with the victim’s intimate parts beyond a reasonable doubt. Jones v. State, 2019 WY 45, 439 P.3d 753,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2019).

Position of authority.

Defendant could not claim on appeal that the crime of second degree sexual assault by a person in a position of authority did not apply to a psychologist because defendant’s no contest plea waived this non-jurisdictional issue, as (1) defendant could have raised the issue in the trial court in a motion to dismiss or argued the issue to a jury, and (2) neither the underlying legal or factual issues barred the State from charging defendant. Popkin v. State, 2018 WY 121, 429 P.3d 53,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2018).

Defendant
was properly convicted of third-degree sexual abuse of a minor because
he was serving in a position of authority over the victim; defendant
was left in charge of the victim while her father went to collect
a paycheck, and it did not matter for how long defendant was left
with the victim or whether he was paid because he occupied the role
as the victim's babysitter and was in a position of authority over
the victim. Rogers v. State, 2015 WY 48, 346 P.3d 934,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2015).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of second-degree sexual abuse of a minor, his niece, because he was connected with the victim by affinity as defendant was the victim's uncle by marriage, and, thus, he occupied a position of authority in relation to the victim; and because the State was not required to demonstrate that defendant was able to exercise significant influence over the victim as he was tried and convicted based on his position as the victim's relative. Butler v. State, 2015 WY 119, 358 P.3d 1259,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2015).

Sufficient evidence demonstrated that defendant was in a “position of authority” as to a victim because defendant's massage therapist-client relationship with the victim contained the required power differential. Solis v. State, 2013 WY 152, 315 P.3d 622,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2013).

Separate and distinct crimes. —

The legislature intended, in subsection (a)(vii)(B), to define sexual intercourse, cunnilingus, fellatio, analingus and anal intercourse as separate and distinct crimes. Padilla v. State, 601 P.2d 189,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 468

(Wyo. 1979).

Incest does not merge into second-degree sexual assault. —

The incest statute requires that the sexual contact or intrusion be committed upon a relative of the accused. This family relationship element prevents the incest conviction from merging into the second-degree sexual assault conviction since a family relationship was not a necessary element for the sexual assault. Owen v. State, 902 P.2d 190,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1995), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

Separate sexual acts. —

Where defendant performed fellatio upon the victim and then made the victim reciprocate, two distinct acts of fellatio were committed and two separate sentences proper. Baum v. State, 745 P.2d 877,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 534

(Wyo. 1987).

In a sexual assault case, defendant was properly sentenced to two consecutive life sentences where defendant subjected the victim to both vaginal and anal sexual penetration, as the acts constituted separate, forcible sexual intrusions on the victim. Daniel v. State, 2003 WY 132, 78 P.3d 205,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 1205, 124 S. Ct. 1476, 158 L. Ed. 2d 127, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 1455 (U.S. 2004).

Merger of sexual assault offense and indecent liberties offense.—

For purposes of sentencing, a merger of a sexual assault offense and an indecent liberties offense may occur when the facts which have been proven at trial establish that the defendant committed only one criminal act. Owen v. State, 902 P.2d 190,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1995), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

Penetration necessary for sexual intercourse. —

There must be penetration of the genital organs of the female in order to constitute sexual intercourse. Rhodes v. State, 462 P.2d 722,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1969). See also State v. Wilson, 32 Wyo. 37, 228 P. 803,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1924).

“Sexual contact” amounts to “abuse” for purposes of child protection provisions. —

“Sexual contact,” as defined by subsection (a)(vi), obviously poses a serious danger to the physical and mental well-being of a child and amounts to “abuse” within the meaning of § 14-3-202(a)(ii) (definitions — child protective services). In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984).

Sexual intrusion. —

Victim's testimony that defendant attempted to have sexual intercourse with her by force but could not complete vaginal penetration because she resisted, along with medical evidence of injuries to the inner portions of her genitalia, provided sufficient evidence to convict defendant of first degree sexual assault; sexual intrusion occurred when defendant penetrated the victim's labia or vulva.
Pryor v. State, 2009 WY 95, 212 P.3d 635,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2009).

On plain error review, defendant showed jury instruction errors alleged were clearly set forth in the record and transgressed a clear and unequivocal rule of law by including fondling or touching the victim's vagina in the definition of sexual intrusion, contrary to the statute, but defendant was entitled to no relief because the instruction also required finding sexual intrusion by inserting a finger in the victim's vagina, so the State had to prove more than the statute required, giving defendant more protection, to prove sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree. Nunamaker v. State, 2017 WY 100, 401 P.3d 863,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2017).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of attempted sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree because he sent messages to the victim on a social media website that stated in extremely graphic detail about his desire to have sexual intercourse and oral sex with the victim; and he took a substantial step to complete the crime as the jury could reasonably infer that defendant was driving to the apartments where he and the victim agreed to meet to pick the victim up and inflict sexual intrusion upon her. Weston v. State, 2019 WY 113, 451 P.3d 758,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2019).

Sexual arousal, gratification element of charged crime. —

The defendant's assertion that his sexual arousal or gratification was not an element of the charged crime of second-degree sexual assault was incorrect; quite clearly, the language of subsection (a)(vii) requires that the intrusion be “for the purposes of sexual arousal, gratification, or abuse.” Mitchell v. State, 865 P.2d 591,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1993).

Defendant was convicted of two counts of third-degree sexual assault under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-304(a)(ii) (repealed) involving his 10-year-old daughter based upon his daughter's testimony that defendant “massaged” her by touching her legs, arms, breasts, buttocks, and genitals; on appeal, the court rejected defendant's argument that the evidence was insufficient to support his conviction because it failed to establish the necessary element that, in touching his daughter, he acted with the intent of sexual arousal, gratification, or abuse as defined in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-301(a)(vi). An oral express of intent was not required; rather, intent of sexual gratification could be inferred from defendant's touching of the victim on more than one occasion and his commission of the acts when alone with the victim.
Trumbull v. State, 2009 WY 103, 214 P.3d 978,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 2009).

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant's conviction of second-degree sexual abuse of a child under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-315(a)(ii) and was sufficient to support the jury's conclusion that defendant touched his victim, a seven-year-old boy, with the intent of sexual arousal, gratification, or abuse because the jury heard the testimony of the victim and the victim's mother, who was defendant's former girlfriend, that defendant would spook with the victim while lying with him in bed and the jury also heard the testimony of the investigating detective that defendant admitted to having an erection when he cuddled with the boy. Although there was no direct testimony that defendant touched the victim's genitals while lying in bed with him, the fact that defendant frequently would lay with the victim knowing that he would be aroused could have led the jury to reasonably infer that, when defendant did touch the boy's genitals on other occasions, he did so with the intent of becoming sexually aroused.
Jones v. State, 2010 WY 44, 228 P.3d 867,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2010).

In a case involving two counts of first-degree sexual abuse of a minor and one count of second-degree sexual abuse of a minor, a district court properly admitted evidence of defendant's prior conviction for third-degree sexual abuse of a minor because it was relevant to show that act was committed for sexual arousal, gratification, or abuse, it was offered for the proper purposes of intent, plan, course of conduct, and motive, and the probative value of the prior conviction was not substantially outweighed by the potential for unfair prejudice. Moreover, defendant presented no authority suggesting why the prosecutor should have been prohibited from referring to this properly-admitted evidence when questioning the various witnesses. Carroll v. State, 2015 WY 87, 352 P.3d 251,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2015).

“Position of authority.” —

Defendant's status as the stepfather of the 17-year-old victim and as a household member satisfied the statutory definition of “position of authority” required for conviction under §

6-2-303

.Blake v. State, 933 P.2d 474,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1997).

“Authority” is defined as: jurisdiction, legal power, legitimacy, prerogative, right to adjudicate, right to command, right to determine, right to settle issues, and rightful power. “Authority” is also defined as: permission; right to exercise powers; to implement and enforce laws; to exact obedience; to command; to judge; control over; and jurisdiction.
Faubion v. State, 2010 WY 79, 233 P.3d 926,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2010).

Term “authority” under this section is synonymous with power.
Faubion v. State, 2010 WY 79, 233 P.3d 926,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2010).

Where patients testified that they were victims of a chiropractor who touched their breasts and pubic areas and made inappropriate remarks during chiropractic treatment, the Supreme Court of Wyoming held that defendant's conduct was third degree sexual assault because he was in a “position of authority” over his patients for purposes of this section. While not engaged in the practice of medicine, chiropractors govern themselves by ethical codes advising practitioners not to take physical advantage of any patient; therefore, the sexual contact that defendant had with his patients was prohibited.
Faubion v. State, 2010 WY 79, 233 P.3d 926,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2010).

Defendant's convictions for third-degree sexual assault pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-303(a)(vi) were supported by the evidence because the State proved that defendant, a certified nursing assistant, stood in a “position of authority” with respect to the victim, as contemplated by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-301(a)(iv); the victim, a man who suffered from a progressive muscle-weakening disease, sought and needed specific nursing services.
Baldes v. State, 2012 WY 67, 267 P.3d 386,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(May 15, 2012).

“Physically helpless.” —

Jury could reasonably conclude that victim was asleep and therefore physically helpless as required under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-301(a)(iii).
Haynes v. State, 2008 WY 75, 186 P.3d 1204,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2008).

While a court erred during defendant's sexual assault trial in admitting hearsay, defendant was not materially prejudiced by the error; defendant admitted to all of the elements of the crime other than the victim's physical helplessness, as defined in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-301(a)(iii), and on that point he provided the jury with sufficient testimony to convict.
Maier v. State, 2012 WY 50, 273 P.3d 1084,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2012).

Instruction on Self-Defense. —

In defendant's trial on charges of aggravated assault and battery and attempted second-degree murder following an altercation with a romantic rival, the trial court did not err in instructing the jury that the right of self-defense was not available to one who was the aggressor or provoked the conflict because the evidence supported the giving of this instruction where the victim testified that defendant had been the aggressor. Although defendant presented a contradictory version of the incident, the district court was not charged with resolving that conflict, which was within the jury's province.
Causey v. State, 2009 WY 111, 215 P.3d 287,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2009), reh'g denied,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. Sept. 29, 2009).

Applied

in

Elliott v. State, 600 P.2d 1044,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 460

(Wyo. 1979); State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1985); Bueno-Hernandez v. State, 724 P.2d 1132,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 612

(Wyo. 1986); Bryan v. State, 745 P.2d 905,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 546

(Wyo. 1987); Lee v. State, 2001 WY 129, 36 P.3d 1133,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 2001); Giles v. State, 2004 WY 101, 96 P.3d 1027,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(2004); Crain v. State, 2009 WY 128, 218 P.3d 934,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Oct. 22, 2009).

Quoted

in

Sears v. State, 632 P.2d 946,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1981); Sanchez v. State, 751 P.2d 1300,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1988); Righter v. State, 752 P.2d 416,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1988); Cardenas v. State, 811 P.2d 989,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1991); Dean v. State, 2003 WY 128, 77 P.3d 692,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2003); Heywood v. State, 2007 WY 149, 170 P.3d 1227,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Sept. 19, 2007); Norgaard v. State, 2014 WY 157,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Dec. 9, 2014); Hathaway v. State, 2017 WY 92, 399 P.3d 625,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

Hirsch v. State, 2006 WY 66, 135 P.3d 586,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. May 31, 2006); Heywood v. State, 2009 WY 70, 208 P.3d 71,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(May 29, 2009); Jones v. State, 2017 WY 44, 393 P.3d 1257,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2017); Carrier v. State, 2017 WY 88, 400 P.3d 358,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rape by husband as a crime against wife within statute relating to competency of husband or wife as witness against the other, 11 ALR2d 646.

Liability of parent or person in loco parentis for rape of minor child, 19 ALR2d 423.

Blood-grouping tests on issue of identity in rape prosecution, 46 ALR2d 1000.

Entrapment to commit offense of sodomy, 52 ALR2d 1194.

Admissibility and propriety, in rape prosecution, of evidence that defendant is married, has children and the like, 62 ALR2d 1067.

Admissibility, in nonstatutory rape prosecution, of evidence of pregnancy, 62 ALR2d 1083.

Consent of minor as defense to assault with intent to commit unnatural sex act upon minor, 65 ALR2d 748.

Intercourse accomplished under pretext of medical treatment as rape, 70 ALR2d 824.

Applicability of rape statute covering child of a specified age with respect to a child who has passed the anniversary date of such age, 73 ALR2d 874.

Admissibility of prior consistent statements of prosecutrix testifying as witness, where her testimony is impeached, 75 ALR2d 909.

Incest as included within charge of rape, 76 ALR2d 484.

Cautionary instructions as to evidence of other similar offense, 77 ALR2d 841.

Intercourse under promise of marriage with girl below the age of consent as statutory rape, 84 ALR2d 1017.

Criminal responsibility of husband for rape, or assault to commit rape, on wife, 84 ALR2d 1017.

Rape by fraud or impersonation, 91 ALR2d 591.

Mistake or lack of information as to victim's age as defense to statutory rape, 8 ALR3d 1100.

Impotency as defense to charge of rape, attempt to commit rape or assault with intent to commit rape, 23 ALR3d 1351.

When woman deemed to be within class contemplated by statute denouncing offense of carnal knowledge of female who is feeble-minded or imbecile, 31 ALR3d 1227.

Statutory rape of female who is, or has been, married, 32 ALR3d 1030.

Mistake or lack of information as to victim's chastity as defense to statutory rape, 44 ALR3d 1434.

Recantation by prosecuting witness in sex crime as ground for new trial, 51 ALR3d 907.

What constitutes penetration in prosecution for rape or statutory rape, 76 ALR3d 163.

Fact that rape victim's complaint or statement was made in response to questions as affecting res gestae character, 80 ALR3d 369.

Multiple instances of forcible intercourse involving same defendant and same victim as constituting multiple crimes of rape, 81 ALR3d 1228.

What constitutes offense of “sexual battery,” 87 ALR3d 1250.

Constitutionality of “rape shield” statute restricting use of evidence of victim's sexual experiences, 1 ALR4th 283.

Admissibility, in rape case, of evidence that accused raped or attempted to rape person other than prosecutrix, 2 ALR4th 330.

Validity and construction of statute defining crime of rape to include activity traditionally punishable as sodomy or the like, 3 ALR4th 1009.

Sufficiency of allegations or evidence of serious bodily injury to support charge of aggravated degree of rape, sodomy, or other sexual abuse, 25 ALR4th 1213.

Conviction of rape or related sexual offense on basis of intercourse accomplished under the pretext of, or in the course of, medical treatment, 65 ALR4th 1064.